Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-505
Expenses, defined.

Expenses shall mean (1) all costs associated with the purchasing, printing, or manufacturing of any items to be used or distributed in the lottery or raffle, (2) all office or clerical expenses in connection with the lottery or raffle, (3) all promotional expenses, (4) all salaries of persons employed to operate, conduct, or supervise any lottery or raffle, (5) any rental or lease expense, and (6) any fee or commission paid to any person associated with the lottery or raffle.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 163.